District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.124

Relationship to District of Columbia law.

No provision of the Agreement shall, in whole or part, invalidate or amend any provision of the law of the District of Columbia. Adoption of the Agreement by the District of Columbia shall not amend or modify any law of the District of Columbia. Implementation of any condition of the Agreement in the District of Columbia, whether adopted before, at, or after membership of the District of Columbia in the Agreement, shall be by the action of the Council.

June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-156, § 5, 49 DCR 4272

History